Arkansas, session 2025, HB1471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-100-305(a)-(c), concerning the annual
review of licenses issued by the Board of Examiners in Speech-Language
Pathology and Audiology, are amended to read as follows:
(a) Licenses issued under this chapter expire and become invalid at
12:00 midnight, June 30, of each year if not renewed each year.
(b) To maintain a license, a person licensed under this chapter shall
pay a fee for renewal of license to the Board of Examiners in Speech-Language
Pathology and Audiology on or before June 30 the expiration date of each
year.
(c)(1)(A) If a request for renewal is postmarked on or before July 15
fifteen (15) days after the expiration date:
(i) The request shall not be considered late; and
(ii) The licensee shall not be:
(a) Considered as practicing without a
license; or
(b) Charged a late fee.
*JMB302*
02/13/2025 9:45:07 AM JMB302

HB1471
(B) If payment of the renewal fee is postmarked on or
after July 16 sixteen (16) days after the expiration date of any given year,
the board may renew a license upon payment of the renewal of license fee plus
a late renewal payment penalty, which shall equal the amount prescribed for
late penalty per month under § 17-100-308.
(C) A license renewed under this subsection becomes
effective on the day after the request for renewal is postmarked.
(2) A person who requests renewal of a license, whose license
has expired, shall not be required to submit to examination as a condition to
renewal.


























02/13/2025 9:45:07 AM JMB302